District of Columbia statutes.
39-301

Established; designation as official cultural institution; duties.

(a)

There is established in the District of Columbia a membership nonprofit corporation which shall be known as the Museum of the City of Washington, Incorporated (hereinafter the “Museum”).

(b)

The Museum is designated as the official cultural institution in the District of Columbia for preserving the record of local achievement, history, culture, and scholarship in history and the arts of the District of Columbia.

(c)

The Museum shall:

(1)

Collect, preserve, and exhibit those historical artifacts, archival material, and works of art relating to the heritage of the citizenry of the District of Columbia; and

(2)

Develop educational programs to enhance public understanding and appreciation of the District of Columbia.

July 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-79, § 2, 27 DCR 2546

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2101.

Prior Codifications